Colorado, session 2026A, HB1371.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-21-1106 as
follows:
23-21-1106. Repeal of part.
THIS PART 11 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-60-109, add (3) as
follows:
23-60-109. Career pathways - design - legislative declaration -
repeal.
(3) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-18-308, amend
(1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(l), and (1)(m) as follows:
23-18-308. Fee-for-service contracts - grants to local district
colleges - limited purpose - repeal.
(1) Subject to available appropriations, the department shall enter
into fee-for-service contracts for the following purposes:
(a) (I) The creation of career pathways for students DESIGNED
pursuant to sections 23-60-109 and 24-46.3-104.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
(c) (I) Cybersecurity and distributed ledger technologies, such as
blockchains, as set forth in sections 24-33.5-1904 and 24-33.5-1905.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2026.
(e) (I) The food systems advisory council pursuant to part 11 of
article 31 of this title 23.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(e) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2026.
(l) (I) The Colorado multidisciplinary health-care provider access
training program created in section 23-21-1103.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(l) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
(m) (I) The creation of education programs ALIGNED pursuant to
section 8-15.7-201. and
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(m) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1905, add
(4)(e) as follows:
24-33.5-1905. Research and development - repeal.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1371

(4) (e) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-15.7-201, add (6) as
follows:
8-15.7-201. State apprenticeship agency - community college
system - career and technical education - apprenticeship programs -
alignment - repeal.
(6) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1371

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1371